test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-h19_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # h_
    prógv+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef: prógv
    prógv+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef: prógv
    prógv+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef: prógvi
    prógv+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef: próvs
    prógv+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef: prógv
    prógv+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef: prógv
    prógv+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef: prógvum
    prógv+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef: prógva
    prógv+N+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def: prógvið
    prógv+N+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def: prógvið
    prógv+N+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def: próvnum
    prógv+N+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def: próvsins
    prógv+N+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def: prógvini
    prógv+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def: prógvini
    prógv+N+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def: prógvunum
    prógv+N+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def: prógvanna
